Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.335.260

School property used for public purposes—Community buildings.

Each school district of the second class, by itself or in combination with any other district or districts, shall have power, when in the judgment of the school board it shall be deemed expedient, to reconstruct, remodel, or build schoolhouses, and to erect, purchase, lease or otherwise acquire other improvements and real and personal property, and establish a communal assembly place and appurtenances, and supply the same with suitable and convenient furnishings and facilities for the uses mentioned in RCW 28A.335.250.

[ 1990 c 33 s 363; 1975 c 43 s 17; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.60.200. Prior: 1913 c 129 s 2; RRS s 4838. Formerly RCW 28A.60.200, 28.63.200.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1975 c 43: See notes following RCW 28A.535.050.